Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YMCA CAMP NORTHERN LIGHTS LODGE.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the YMCA of the North to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a facility on the campus of the YMCA Camp Northern Lights in St. Louis County, to integrate more campers and families to build community in the northern woods. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end